Hawaii statutes.
§431:19-305 Participants in sponsored
captive insurance companies. (a) Associations, corporations,
limited liability companies, partnerships, trusts, risk retention groups, and other
business entities may be participants in any sponsored captive insurance company
formed or licensed under this chapter.

(b) A sponsor of a sponsored captive insurance
company may be a participant.

(c) A participant need not be a shareholder or
member of the sponsored captive insurance company or any affiliate thereof.

(d) A participant shall insure only its own risks through
a sponsored captive insurance company. [L 2008, c 190, pt of §1; am L 2016, c
141, §11]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next